Missouri, session 2026, HB1942.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 376, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 376.1249, to read as follows:
376.1249. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Cost-sharing", any co-payment, coinsurance, deductible, amount paid by
an enrollee for health care services in excess of a coverage limitation, or similar charge
required by or on behalf of an enrollee in order to receive a specific health care service
covered by a health benefit plan. The term "cost-sharing" shall include cost-sharing as
defined in 42 U.S.C. Section 18022(c);
(2) "Enrollee", the same meaning given to the term in section 376.1350;
(3) "Health benefit plan", the same meaning given to the term in section
376.1350;
(4) "Health care service", the same meaning given to the term in section
376.1350;
(5) "Health carrier", the same meaning given to the term in section 376.1350.
2. Each health carrier or health benefit plan that offers or issues health benefit
plans that are delivered, issued for delivery, continued, or renewed in this state on or
after January 1, 2027, shall provide coverage for one annual office visit, using
appropriate routine evaluation and management Current Procedural Terminology
codes or any successor codes, for a whole body skin examination for lesions suspicious
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1942 2
for skin cancer. The whole body skin examination shall be indicated using an
appropriate International Statistical Classification of Diseases and Related Health
Problems code or any successor codes.
3. No health carrier or health benefit plan shall impose any cost-sharing
requirement with respect to coverage required under this section. If, under federal law,
application of the requirement under this subsection would result in health savings
account ineligibility under Section 223 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended, the requirement under this subsection shall apply to health savings account-
qualified high deductible health plans with respect to any cost-sharing of such a plan
after the enrollee has satisfied the minimum deductible under Section 223, except with
respect to items or services that are preventive care under Section 223(c)(2)(C) of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, in which case the requirement of this
subsection shall apply regardless of whether the minimum deductible under Section 223
has been satisfied.
4. The provisions of this section shall not apply to a supplemental insurance
policy, including a life care contract, accident-only policy, specified disease policy,
hospital policy providing a fixed daily benefit only, Medicare supplement policy, long-
term care policy, short-term major medical policy of six months' or less duration, or any
other supplemental policy as determined by the director of the department of commerce
and insurance.
✔